Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3505.05
Medical condition, defined.

Medical condition means a disease, physical ailment, or injury requiring inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential care facility or involving any period of incapacity due to a condition for which treatment may not be effective.

Laws 2009, LB94, § 2.